Utah statutes.
75-1-310.   Costs -- In discretion of court.

When not otherwise prescribed in this code, the court, or the Supreme Court on appeal from the court, may, in its discretion, order costs to be paid by any party to the proceedings or out of the assets of the estate as justice may require.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

